North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-06.1 Corporate or Limited Liability Company Farming
10-06.1-26.
Protection of minority shareholders.

If a shareholder owns less than fifty percent of the shares of a farming or ranching corporation doing business under this chapter, and if the terms and conditions for the repurchase of those shares by the corporation or by the other shareholders are not set forth in the bylaws or the instrument which transferred the shares to the shareholder, or are not the subject of a shareholders’ agreement or an agreement between that shareholder and the corporation, then the disposition of such shares must be determined by this section upon the withdrawal of the shareholder. Any shareholder who desires to withdraw from the corporation shall first offer the shares for sale to the remaining shareholders in proportion to the shares owned by them. If not all of the shareholders wish to purchase the shares, any one shareholder may purchase all of the shares of the withdrawing shareholder. If no shareholder desires to purchase the shares of a withdrawing shareholder, then the corporation may purchase the shares. If the corporation chooses not to purchase the shares of the withdrawing shareholder, then the withdrawing shareholder may sell the shares to any other person eligible to be a shareholder. If the withdrawing shareholder is unable to sell the shares to any other person eligible to become a shareholder, then the withdrawing shareholder may bring an action in district court to dissolve the corporation. Upon a finding that the withdrawing shareholder cannot sell the shares at a fair price, the court shall enter an order directing that the corporation itself or any or all of the remaining shareholders pro rata or otherwise shall have twelve months from the date of the court’s order to purchase the shares of the withdrawing shareholder at a fair price as determined by the court and that if the shares of the withdrawing shareholder are not completely purchased at said price, the corporation shall be dissolved and the assets of the corporation shall be first used to pay all the liabilities of the corporation with the remaining net assets to be distributed pro rata to the shareholders in proportion to their ownership of shares. For the purpose of this section, a fair price for the shares of the withdrawing shareholder must be determined as though the shares were being valued for federal gift tax purposes under the Internal Revenue Code.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 54, § 2.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-06-15.

10-06.1-27.
Protection of minority members.

If a member owns less than fifty percent of the membership interest of a farming or ranching limited liability company doing business under this chapter and if the terms and conditions for the repurchase of that membership interest by the limited liability company or by the other members are not set forth in the bylaws, the instrument that transferred the membership interest to the member, or are not the subject of a member-control agreement or other agreement between that member and the limited liability company, the disposition of the membership interest must be determined by this section upon the withdrawal of the member. Any member who desires to withdraw from the limited liability company shall first offer the membership interest for sale to the remaining members in proportion to the membership interests owned by the remaining members. If not all of the members wish to purchase the membership interest, any one member can purchase all of the membership interest of the withdrawing member. If no member desires to purchase the membership interest of the withdrawing member, the limited liability company may purchase the membership interest. If the limited liability company chooses not to purchase the membership interest of the withdrawing member, the withdrawing member may sell the membership interest to any other person eligible to be a member. If the withdrawing member is unable to sell the membership interest to any other person eligible to become a member, the withdrawing member may bring an action in district court to terminate the limited liability company. Upon a finding that the withdrawing member cannot sell the membership interest at a fair price, the court shall enter an order directing that the limited liability company or any of the remaining members pro rata or otherwise, have twelve months from the date of the court’s order to purchase the membership interest of the withdrawing member at a fair price as determined by the court and that if the membership interest of the withdrawing member is not completely purchased at the fair price, the limited liability company must be dissolved and the assets of the limited liability company must be first used to pay all liabilities of the limited liability company with the remaining net assets to be distributed pro rata to the members in proportion to the member’s membership interest ownership. For the purpose of this section, a fair price for the membership interest of the withdrawing member must be determined as though the membership interest was being valued for federal gift tax purposes under the Internal Revenue Code.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 54, § 2; 1999, ch. 95, § 4.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-06-15.